Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2640.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sgt. Elwood Eugene Rumbaugh Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Elwood Eugene Rumbaugh was born September 10, 1943, in Warren, Ohio.(2) Sgt. Rumbaugh attended Leavittsburg High School in Leavittsburg, Ohio.(3) Outside of work, Sgt. Rumbaugh was a resident of Cambria County, Pennsylvania, where he enjoyed spending time with family and friends and hunting.(4) Sgt. Rumbaugh joined the United States Air Force, where he served as Flight Engineer CH-53 helicopter, 21st Special Operations Squadron Staff Sergeant.12345678910111213141516171819 (5) Sgt. Rumbaugh was declared missing-in-action on May 15, 1975, near Koh Tang Island, Gulf of Thailand.(6) Sgt. Rumbaugh was awarded the Purple Heart for his service during Vietnam on May 15, 1975.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 48742, carrying State Route 4009 over Fox Run in Northern Cambria Borough, Cambria County, is designated the Sgt. Elwood Eugene Rumbaugh Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2640PN3619 - 2 - 12345678910111213